Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Protection Services Appropriations by Fund General 20,828,000 deleted text begin 21,207,000 deleted text end new text begin 21,457,000 new text end Remediation 399,000 399,000 (a) $399,000 the first year and $399,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for administrative funding of the voluntary cleanup program. (b) $639,000 the first year and $639,000 the second year are for the soil health financial assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.134. The commissioner may award no more than $50,000 of the appropriation each year to a single recipient. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. Appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for soil health financial assistance grants are available until June 30, 2029. (c) $275,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for compensation for livestock destroyed or crippled by a wolf under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737. The first year appropriation may be spent to compensate for livestock that were destroyed or crippled during fiscal year 2025. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $5,000 each year to reimburse expenses incurred by university extension educators to provide fair market values of destroyed or crippled livestock. If the commissioner receives federal money to pay claims for destroyed or crippled livestock, an equivalent amount of this appropriation may be used to reimburse nonlethal prevention methods performed by federal wildlife services staff. The base for this appropriation is $175,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (d) $255,000 the first year and $230,000 the second year are for compensation for crop or fence damage caused by elk under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.7371. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $10,000 of the appropriation each year to reimburse expenses incurred by the commissioner or the commissioner's approved agent to investigate and resolve claims, as well as for costs associated with training for approved agents. The commissioner may use up to $40,000 of the appropriation each year for grants to producers for measures to protect stored crops from elk damage. If the commissioner determines that claims made under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737 or 3.7371, are unusually high, amounts appropriated for either program may be transferred to the appropriation for the other program. The base for this appropriation is $155,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (e) $825,000 the first year and $825,000 the second year are to replace capital equipment in the Department of Agriculture's analytical laboratory. (f) $750,000 the first year and $750,000 the second year are for additional meat and poultry inspection services. The commissioner is encouraged to seek inspection waivers, match federal money, and offer more online inspections for the purposes of this paragraph. This is a onetime appropriation. (g) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for grants to counties to support county agricultural inspectors. The commissioner may use up to three percent of the appropriation each year for administration. This is a onetime appropriation. County agricultural inspectors and county-designated employees must annually submit an application, on a form approved by the commissioner, to be eligible for funding during a given year. The commissioner must equally divide available grant money among eligible counties. To be eligible for grants under this section, a county must employ a county agricultural inspector or a county-designated employee who: (1) has attended training for new county agricultural inspectors offered by the commissioner; (2) coordinates with the commissioner to review applicable laws and enforcement procedures; (3) compiles and submits to the commissioner local weed inspector annual report data; (4) conducts an annual meeting and training for local weed inspectors; and (5) assists the commissioner with control programs and other agricultural programs when requested under Minnesota Statutes, section 18.81, subdivision 1b, as directed by the county board. (h) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are appropriated to establish and administer the biofertilizer innovation and efficiency program deleted text begin under Minnesota Statutes, section 18C.113deleted text end . The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2027. This is a onetime appropriation. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end $75,000 the first year is to conduct an evaluation of the practice performance and economic performance of the Olmsted County groundwater protection and soil health initiative, including the cover crop program, alternative crops program, and haying, grazing, and pasture enhancement program. The evaluation must look at environmental outcomes, include a cost-benefit analysis, and be submitted to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance by June 1, 2027. The commissioner may contract with an independent third party to conduct the evaluation. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end $420,000 the first year and $924,000 the second year are to support current services. Sec. 2. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 11, section 11, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Agricultural Marketing and Development 23,551,000 deleted text begin 23,301,000 deleted text end new text begin 24,301,000 new text end (a) $634,000 the first year and $634,000 the second year are for the continuation of the dairy development and profitability enhancement program, including dairy profitability teams and dairy business planning grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 32D.30. (b) The commissioner may use funds appropriated in this subdivision for annual cost-share payments to resident farmers or entities that sell, process, or package agricultural products in this state for the costs of organic certification. The commissioner may allocate these funds for assistance to persons transitioning from conventional to organic agriculture. (c) $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are for mental health outreach and support to farmers, ranchers, farm workers and employees, and others in the agricultural community and profession and for farm and farm worker safety grant and outreach programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1195. Mental health outreach and support may include a 24-hour hotline, stigma reduction, and education. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. The base for this appropriation is $50,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (d) $700,000 the first year and $700,000 the second year are for the local food purchasing assistance grant program under article 3, section 35. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. new text begin (e) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are to expand the Emerging Farmers Office and provide services to beginning and emerging farmers to increase connections between farmers and market opportunities throughout the state. This appropriation may be used for grants, translation services, training programs, or other purposes in line with the recommendations of the emerging farmer working group established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.055, subdivision 1. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end $18,257,000 the first year and $18,007,000 the second year are for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12. The base for this appropriation is $17,449,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Except as provided in paragraph deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end , the commissioner may allocate the appropriation in paragraph deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end each year among the following areas: facilitating the startup, modernization, improvement, or expansion of livestock operations, including beginning and transitioning livestock operations with preference given to robotic dairy-milking equipment; assisting value-added agricultural businesses to begin or expand, to access new markets, or to diversify, including aquaponics systems, with preference given to hemp fiber processing equipment; facilitating the startup, modernization, or expansion of other beginning and transitioning farms, including by providing loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 41B.056; sustainable agriculture on-farm research and demonstration; the development or expansion of food hubs and other alternative community-based food distribution systems; enhancing renewable energy infrastructure and use; crop research, including basic and applied turf seed research; Farm Business Management tuition assistance; supporting the commercialization of an innovative material additive utilizing agricultural coproducts or waste streams to produce fiber-based barrier packaging to reduce perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and plastics in packaging products; and good agricultural practices and good handling practices certification assistance. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to 7.5 percent of the appropriation in paragraph deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end for costs incurred to administer the program. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Of the amount appropriated for the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12: (1) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for distribution in equal amounts to each of the state's county fairs to preserve and promote Minnesota agriculture; (2) $3,000,000 the first year and $3,000,000 the second year are for incentive payments under Minnesota Statutes, sections 41A.16, 41A.17, 41A.18, and 41A.20. If this appropriation exceeds the total amount for which all producers are eligible in a fiscal year, the balance of the appropriation is available for other purposes under this paragraph; (3) $2,750,000 the first year and $2,750,000 the second year are for grants that enable retail petroleum dispensers, fuel storage tanks, and other equipment to dispense biofuels to the public in accordance with the biofuel replacement goals established under Minnesota Statutes, section 239.7911. A retail petroleum dispenser selling petroleum for use in spark ignition engines for vehicle model years after 2000 is eligible for grant money under this clause if the retail petroleum dispenser has no more than 20 retail petroleum dispensing sites and each site is located in Minnesota. The grant money must be used to replace or upgrade equipment that does not have the ability to be certified for E25. A grant award must not exceed 65 percent of the cost of the appropriate technology. A grant award must not exceed $200,000 per station. The commissioner must cooperate with biofuel stakeholders in the implementation of the grant program. The commissioner, in cooperation with any economic or community development financial institution and any other entity with which the commissioner contracts, must submit deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin thenew text end report deleted text begin ondeleted text end new text begin under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12, subdivision 3, that includes metrics ofnew text end the biofuels infrastructure financial assistance program deleted text begin by January 15deleted text end each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. The annual report must include but not be limited to a summary of the following metrics: (i) the number and types of projects financed; (ii) the amount of dollars leveraged or matched per project; (iii) the geographic distribution of financed projects; (iv) any market expansion associated with upgraded infrastructure; (v) the demographics of the areas served; (vi) the costs of the program; and (vii) the number of grants to minority-owned or female-owned businesses; (4) $350,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for grants to facilitate the startup, modernization, or expansion of meat, poultry, egg, and milk processing facilities. A grant award under this clause must not exceed $200,000; (5) $1,594,000 the first year and $1,544,000 the second year are for providing more fruits, vegetables, meat, poultry, grain, and dairy for children in school and early childhood education settings, including, at the commissioner's discretion, providing grants to reimburse schools and early childhood education and child care providers for purchasing equipment and agricultural products. Of the amount appropriated, $150,000 each year is for a statewide coordinator of farm-to-institution strategy and programming. The coordinator must consult with relevant stakeholders and provide technical assistance and training for participating farmers and eligible grant recipients. The base for this appropriation is $1,636,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. At the commissioner's discretion, for state administration of federal cooperative agreements for purchasing Minnesota grown and raised foods for schools, child care providers, food banks, and other institutions, the commissioner may use an amount of state funds equal to no more than 7.5 percent of the total federal funds awarded to the state. The commissioner shall expend any available federal administrative funds awarded for this purpose before using state funds; (6) up to $1,750,000 the first year and up to $1,750,000 the second year are for grants to facilitate the development of urban agriculture, including projects related to youth education, community and economic development, value-added processing, and vocational training; (7) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for the food retail improvement and development program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1017; (8) up to $200,000 the first year and up to $200,000 the second year are for cooperative development grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.1016; (9) $250,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year are for the protecting livestock grant program for producers to support the installation of measures to prevent the transmission of avian influenza. For the appropriation in this clause, a grant applicant must document a cost-share of 20 percent. An applicant's cost-share amount may be reduced up to $2,000 to cover time and labor costs. This is a onetime appropriation; and (10) up to $525,000 the first year and up to $525,000 the second year are to award AGRI Works grants to institutions and organizations to provide regional and statewide services. Preference shall be given to legislatively created entities and organizations that enhance agricultural, horticultural, or rural community and economic development, marketing, and promotion, and research and education. A grant award under this clause must not exceed $200,000. Grants made under this paragraph are subject to the requirements in Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.98 and 16B.981. This is a onetime appropriation. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriation in paragraph deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end does not cancel at the end of the second year and is available until June 30, 2029. Appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2029, for agricultural growth, research, and innovation grants are available until June 30, 2032. At the end of fiscal year 2027, the commissioner must prioritize any money resulting from canceled contracts to be used for AGRI Works grants under paragraph deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end , clause (10). Sec. 3. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 2, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 11, section 12, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Administration and Financial Assistance 14,179,000 deleted text begin 11,145,000 deleted text end new text begin 9,895,000 new text end (a) $474,000 the first year and $474,000 the second year are for payments to county and district agricultural societies and associations under Minnesota Statutes, section 38.02, subdivision 1. Aid payments to county and district agricultural societies and associations must be disbursed no later than July 15 each year. These payments are the amount of aid from the state for an annual fair held in the previous calendar year. (b) $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Education and Leadership Council for programs of the council under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 41D. The base for this appropriation is $250,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (c) $1,250,000 the first year and $1,250,000 the second year are to award and administer farm down payment assistance grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.133, with priority given to eligible applicants with no more than $100,000 in annual gross farm product sales and eligible applicants who are producers of industrial hemp, cannabis, or one or more of the following specialty crops as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture for purposes of the specialty crop block grant program: fruits and vegetables, tree nuts, dried fruits, medicinal plants, culinary herbs and spices, horticulture crops, floriculture crops, and nursery crops. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of the first year does not cancel and is available in the second year and appropriations encumbered under contract by June 30, 2027, are available until June 30, 2029. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (d) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for the purchase of milk for distribution to Minnesota's food shelves and other charitable organizations that are eligible to receive food from the food banks. Milk purchased with grant money must be acquired from Minnesota milk processors and based on low-cost bids. The milk must be allocated to each Feeding America food bank serving Minnesota according to the formula used in the distribution of United States Department of Agriculture commodities under The Emergency Food Assistance Program. The commissioner may enter into contracts or agreements with food banks for shared funding or reimbursement of the direct purchase of milk. Each food bank that receives funding under this paragraph may use up to two percent for administrative expenses. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance the first year does not cancel and is available the second year. (e) $260,000 the first year and $260,000 the second year are for a pass-through grant to Region Five Development Commission to provide, in collaboration with Farm Business Management, statewide mental health counseling support to Minnesota farm operators, families, and employees, and individuals who work with Minnesota farmers in a professional capacity. Region Five Development Commission may use up to 7.5 percent of the grant awarded under this paragraph for administration. deleted text begin (f) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are to expand the Emerging Farmers Office and provide services to beginning and emerging farmers to increase connections between farmers and market opportunities throughout the state. This appropriation may be used for grants, translation services, training programs, or other purposes in line with the recommendations of the emerging farmer working group established under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.055, subdivision 1. deleted text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end $137,000 the first year and $203,000 the second year are to support current services. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end $337,000 the first year and $337,000 the second year are for farm advocate services. Of these amounts, $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for the continuation of the farmland transition programs and may be used for grants to farmland access teams to provide technical assistance to potential beginning farmers. Farmland access teams must assist existing farmers and beginning farmers with transitioning farm ownership and farm operation. Services provided by teams may include but are not limited to mediation assistance, designing contracts, financial planning, tax preparation, estate planning, and housing assistance. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end $3,000,000 the first year is for transfer to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to First District Association to acquire land for and to design, engineer, construct, equip, and furnish a wastewater treatment project. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 15, subdivision 7. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end $50,000 the first year is to be awarded as a grant in a competitive bid process to an entity that is not a for-profit entity to conduct a study of market and workforce factors that may contribute to the incorrect marking for the installation of underground telecommunications infrastructure that is located within ten feet of existing underground utilities or that crosses the existing underground utilities. The study must include recommendations to the legislature and be submitted to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance by June 1, 2027. deleted text begin (r)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end $50,000 the first year is to conduct a study and develop recommendations for establishing an incentive-based program to support and encourage agricultural retailers in promoting 4R nutrient management practices. The 4R nutrient management practices include: the right source of nutrients, at the right rate and right time, in the right place. (1) As part of the study, the department must evaluate strategies for leveraging cost-share programs, including the feasibility of coordinating with the Agricultural Water Quality Certification Program and other efforts related to the state's Nutrient Reduction Strategy. (2) The commissioner must submit a report detailing its findings, including potential funding sources and proposal outlines for funding requests where appropriate. The commissioner must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and environment by March 15, 2026. deleted text begin (s)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end The commissioner shall continue to increase connections with ethnic minority and immigrant farmers to farming opportunities and farming programs throughout the state. ARTICLE 2 AGRICULTURE POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 17.1017, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Legislative report. The commissioner, in cooperation with any economic or community development financial institution and any other entity with which it contracts, shall submit deleted text begin an annualdeleted text end new text begin the new text end report deleted text begin ondeleted text end new text begin under section 41A.12, subdivision 3, that includes metrics of new text end the food retail improvement and development program deleted text begin by January 15 ofdeleted text end each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. The deleted text begin annualdeleted text end report shall includedeleted text begin , but not be limited to,deleted text end a summary of the following metrics: (1) the number and types of projects financed; (2) the amount of dollars leveraged or matched per project; (3) the geographic distribution of financed projects; (4) the number and types of technical assistance recipients; (5) the demographics of the areas served; (6) the costs of the program; (7) the number of SNAP dollars spent; (8) any increase in retail square footage; (9) the number of loans or grants to businesses owned by women and Black, Indigenous, or Persons of Color; and (10) measurable economic and health outcomes, including, but not limited to, increases in sales and consumption of locally sourced and other fresh fruits and vegetables, the number of construction and retail jobs retained or created, and any health initiatives associated with the program. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 17.458, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definition. "Agroforestry" means new text begin the intentional integration of trees and shrubs into crop and animal farming systems to create a more sustainable, diverse, and productive land-use system. Agroforestry includes new text end the cultivation of short-rotation woody crops using agricultural practices to produce timber or forest products. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.01, is amended to read: 18J.01 DEFINITIONS. (a) The definitions in new text begin this section; chapters 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, and 232; and new text end sections deleted text begin 18G.02, 18H.02, 18K.02, 27.01, 223.16, 231.01, and 232.21deleted text end new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 and 21.80 to 21.92new text end apply to this chapter. (b) For purposes of this chapter, "associated rules" means rules adopted under this chapter, chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232, or sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 and new text end 21.80 to 21.92. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.02, is amended to read: 18J.02 DUTIES OF COMMISSIONER. The commissioner shall administer and enforce this chapter, chapters 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, and 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125, and new text end 21.80 to 21.92; and associated rules. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.03, is amended to read: 18J.03 CIVIL LIABILITY. A person regulated by this chapter, chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232, or sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92, is civilly liable for any violation of one of those statutes or associated rules by the person's employee or agent. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Access and entry. The commissioner, upon presentation of official department credentials, must be granted immediate access at reasonable times to sites where a person manufactures, distributes, uses, handles, disposes of, stores, or transports seeds, plants, grain, household goods, general merchandise, produce, or other living or nonliving products or other objects regulated under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Purpose of entry. (a) The commissioner may enter sites for: (1) inspection of inventory and equipment for the manufacture, storage, handling, distribution, disposal, or any other process regulated under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules; (2) sampling of sites, seeds, plants, products, grain, household goods, general merchandise, produce, or other living or nonliving objects that are manufactured, stored, distributed, handled, or disposed of at those sites and regulated under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules; (3) inspection of records related to the manufacture, distribution, storage, handling, or disposal of seeds, plants, products, grain, household goods, general merchandise, produce, or other living or nonliving objects regulated under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules; (4) investigating compliance with chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules; or (5) other purposes necessary to implement chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules. (b) The commissioner may enter any public or private premises during or after regular business hours without notice of inspection when a suspected violation of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules may threaten public health or the environment. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.04, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notice of inspection samples and analyses. (a) The commissioner shall provide the owner, operator, or agent in charge with a receipt describing any samples obtained. If requested, the commissioner shall split any samples obtained and provide them to the owner, operator, or agent in charge. If an analysis is made of the samples, a copy of the results of the analysis must be furnished to the owner, operator, or agent in charge within 30 days after an analysis has been performed. If an analysis is not performed, the commissioner must notify the owner, operator, or agent in charge within 30 days of the decision not to perform the analysis. (b) The sampling and analysis must be done according to methods provided for under applicable provisions of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules. In cases not covered by those sections and methods or in cases where methods are available in which improved applicability has been demonstrated the commissioner may adopt appropriate methods from other sources. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.04, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Inspection requests by others. (a) A person who believes that a violation of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules has occurred may request an inspection by giving notice to the commissioner of the violation. The notice must be in writing, state with reasonable particularity the grounds for the notice, and be signed by the person making the request. (b) If after receiving a notice of violation the commissioner reasonably believes that a violation has occurred, the commissioner shall make a special inspection in accordance with the provisions of this section as soon as practicable, to determine if a violation has occurred. (c) An inspection conducted pursuant to a notice under this subdivision may cover an entire site and is not limited to the portion of the site specified in the notice. If the commissioner determines that reasonable grounds to believe that a violation occurred do not exist, the commissioner must notify the person making the request in writing of the determination. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Enforcement required. (a) A violation of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or an associated rule is a violation of this chapter. (b) Upon the request of the commissioner, county attorneys, sheriffs, and other officers having authority in the enforcement of the general criminal laws must take action to the extent of their authority necessary or proper for the enforcement of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules or valid orders, standards, stipulations, and agreements of the commissioner. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.05, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Commissioner's discretion. If minor violations of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules occur or the commissioner believes the public interest will be best served by a suitable notice of warning in writing, this section does not require the commissioner to: (1) report the violation for prosecution; (2) institute seizure proceedings; or (3) issue a withdrawal from distribution, stop-sale, or other order. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.05, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Agent for service of process. All persons licensed, permitted, registered, or certified under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules must appoint the commissioner as the agent upon whom all legal process may be served and service upon the commissioner is deemed to be service on the licensee, permittee, registrant, or certified person. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.06, is amended to read: 18J.06 FALSE STATEMENT OR RECORD. A person must not knowingly make or offer a false statement, record, or other information as part of: (1) an application for registration, license, certification, or permit under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules; (2) records or reports required under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules; or (3) an investigation of a violation of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Cancellation of registration, permit, license, certification. The commissioner may cancel or revoke a registration, permit, license, or certification provided for under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules or refuse to register, permit, license, or certify under provisions of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules if the registrant, permittee, licensee, or certified person has used fraudulent or deceptive practices in the evasion or attempted evasion of a provision of chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.07, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Service of order or notice. (a) If a person is not available for service of an order, the commissioner may attach the order to the facility, site, seed or seed container, plant or other living or nonliving object regulated under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules and notify the owner, custodian, other responsible party, or registrant. (b) The seed, seed container, plant, or other living or nonliving object regulated under chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules may not be sold, used, tampered with, or removed until released under conditions specified by the commissioner, by an administrative law judge, or by a court. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.07, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Unsatisfied judgments. (a) An applicant for a license, permit, registration, or certification under provisions of this chapter, chapter 18G, 18H, 18K, 27, 223, 231, or 232; sections new text begin 21.111 to 21.125 or new text end 21.80 to 21.92; or associated rules may not allow a final judgment against the applicant for damages arising from a violation of those statutes or rules to remain unsatisfied for a period of more than 30 days. (b) Failure to satisfy, within 30 days, a final judgment resulting from a violation of this chapter results in automatic suspension of the license, permit, registration, or certification. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18J.09, is amended to read: 18J.09 CREDITING OF PENALTIES, FEES, AND COSTS. Penalties, cost reimbursements, fees, and other money collected under this chapter must be deposited into the state treasury and credited to the appropriate nursery and phytosanitarynew text begin account under section 18H.17new text end , industrial hempnew text begin account under section 18K.07new text end , deleted text begin ordeleted text end seed new text begin potato inspection new text end accountnew text begin under section 21.115, seed inspection account under section 21.92, or grain buyers and storage account under sections 223.17 and 232.22new text end . Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18K.02, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Processing. "Processing" means rendering by refinement hemp plants or hemp plant parts from their natural or original state after harvest. Processing includes but is not limited to decortication, devitalization, chopping, crushing, extractionnew text begin of plant substances other than cannabinoidsnew text end , and deleted text begin packagingdeleted text end new text begin pressingnew text end . Processing does not include typical farm operations such as sorting, grading, baling, and harvesting. Processing does not include new text begin extraction of cannabinoids or new text end the production of artificially derived cannabinoids as defined in section 342.01, subdivision 6. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18K.02, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Processing location. "Processing location" means any area, building, plant, or facility registered with and approved by the commissioner in which a licensee converts raw new text begin industrial new text end hemp into a marketable product. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18K.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirement; issuance; presumption. (a) A person must obtain a license from the commissioner before (1) growing industrial hemp, (2) processing industrial hemp, or (3) researching industrial hemp. (b) To obtain a license under paragraph (a), a person must apply to the commissioner in the form prescribed by the commissioner and must pay the annual registration and inspection fee established by the commissioner in accordance with section 16A.1285, subdivision 2. (c) For a license to grow new text begin or process new text end industrial hemp, the license application must include the name and address of the applicant and the legal description of the land area or areas where industrial hemp will be grown new text begin or processed new text end by the applicant and any other information required under Code of Federal Regulations, title 7, part 990. deleted text begin (d) For a license to process industrial hemp, the license application must include the name and address of the applicant, the legal description of the processing location, and any other information required by the commissioner. deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end A licensee is responsible for compliance with the license requirements irrespective of the acts or omissions of an authorized representative acting on behalf of the licensee. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e) new text end When an applicant has paid the fee and completed the application process to the satisfaction of the commissioner, the commissioner must issue a license which is valid until December 31 of the year of application. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f) new text end A person licensed under paragraph (a) to grow industrial hemp is presumed to be growing industrial hemp for commercial or research purposes. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.111, is amended to read: 21.111 DEFINITIONS. Subdivision 1. Scope. When used in sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122deleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings ascribed to them. deleted text begin Subd. 2. deleted text end deleted text begin Inspected. deleted text end deleted text begin "Inspected" means that the potato plants are examined in the field and that the harvested potatoes produced by the potato plants are examined by or under the authority of the commissioner. For seed potatoes produced in a lab, inspected means that the lab's records, including records related to the lab's procedures and protocols, as well as the seed potatoes, have been examined under the authority of the commissioner. deleted text end Subd. 3. Certified. "Certified" means that the potatoes deleted text begin weredeleted text end new text begin have beennew text end inspected while growing in the field andnew text begin , when possible,new text end again after being harvested, and deleted text begin were thereafter duly certified deleted text end deleted text begin by or under the authority of the commissioner, as provideddeleted text end new text begin the potatoes meet the requirementsnew text end in sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122, and as provided by rules adopted and published by the commissionerdeleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end . For seed potatoes produced in a deleted text begin labdeleted text end new text begin an indoor facility or greenhousenew text end , certified means that: deleted text begin (1)deleted text end the seed potato deleted text begin labdeleted text end facilitiesnew text begin ,new text end deleted text begin and the lab'sdeleted text end proceduresnew text begin ,new text end and protocols have been examined under the authority of the commissionerdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) the seed potatoes have been inspected after they have been harvested, removed, or released from the lab, and were duly certified by or under the authority of the commissioner, as provided in sections 21.111 to 21.122. deleted text end deleted text begin Subd. 3a. deleted text end deleted text begin Interstate cooperation. deleted text end deleted text begin In order to best use state resources, the commissioner may enter into agreements with other seed potato certification entities to carry out the purposes of sections 21.111 to 21.122. Any agreement may provide for field inspections, shipping point inspections, winter tests, and other certification functions to be carried out by personnel employed by either entity according to methods determined by the certification entities of the respective areas. The commissioner may extend seed potato certification services to states where growers wish to grow certified seed potatoes and the state does not have a seed potato certification program. Any agreement must be reported to the chairs of the legislative committees responsible for the budget or policy of the seed potato inspection program and to the commissioner of management and budget. deleted text end new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin "Certified seed potatoes" means potatoes that have been produced, graded, sacked or placed in bulk, inspected, and certified in accordance with this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Class. new text end new text begin "Class" means the seed quality level related to compliance with tolerances for diseases and varietal purity. new text end new text begin Subd. 3d. new text end new text begin Clone. new text end new text begin "Clone" means a unit of seed potatoes that is the progeny of one plant, which has been tested to become eligible to produce Generation 1 class seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Subd. 3e. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designee. new text end new text begin Subd. 3f. new text end new text begin Crop. new text end new text begin "Crop" means all lots produced on a farm in one year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3g. new text end new text begin Department. new text end new text begin "Department" means the Department of Agriculture. new text end new text begin Subd. 3h. new text end new text begin Explant. new text end new text begin "Explant" means an in vitro potato plant or a plantlet that is produced by rooting an excised tip of a tuber sprout or an axillary bud from a growing plant and that serves as a parent for a whole clone or accession of micropropagated plants or plantlets. new text end new text begin Subd. 3i. new text end new text begin Farm. new text end new text begin "Farm" means a potato-growing enterprise. Farm includes all land, equipment, storage facilities, and laborers used to produce potatoes. new text end new text begin Subd. 3j. new text end new text begin Field. new text end new text begin "Field" means a plot of land on a farm where potatoes are grown. new text end new text begin Subd. 3k. new text end new text begin Inspected. new text end new text begin (a) For plants growing in a field, "inspected" means that the commissioner has examined the plants in the field where the plants are grown and has visually assessed the plants for disease and factors impacting quality. new text end new text begin (b) For harvested potatoes, inspected means that the commissioner has observed the tubers and, when requested, the commissioner has evaluated the tubers for quality and conditions described in section 21.125. new text end new text begin (c) For seed potatoes produced in a facility or greenhouse, inspected means that the commissioner has examined the seed potatoes and the facility's records, including records related to the facility's procedures and protocols. new text end new text begin Subd. 3l. new text end new text begin Lot. new text end new text begin "Lot" means a group of seed potatoes of one variety, planted in one continuous plot, grown on the same farm, and physically separated from other lots while being grown and stored. new text end new text begin Subd. 3m. new text end new text begin Material in maintenance. new text end new text begin "Material in maintenance" means propagative material, plantlets, or tubers that are maintained, not multiplied, under controlled laboratory conditions. new text end new text begin Subd. 3n. new text end new text begin Roguing. new text end new text begin "Roguing" is the process of removing infected plants from a field of certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Subd. 3o. new text end new text begin Stand. new text end new text begin "Stand" is the live plant population in a certified seed potato lot. new text end Subd. 5. Seed potatoes. "Seed potatoes" means potatoes used, sold, offered or exposed for sale, or held with intent to sell or as a sample representing any lot or stock of potatoes offered or exposed for sale or held with intent to sell within this state, for the purpose of planting. Subd. 6. Person. "Person" includes an individual, new text begin a new text end partnership, new text begin a new text end corporation, new text begin a new text end company, new text begin a new text end society, new text begin an new text end association, and deleted text begin firmsdeleted text end new text begin a firmnew text end . new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Physically separated. new text end new text begin "Physically separated" means separated by at least the width of one row and markings such as flags at every corner of the lot. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Rejected. new text end new text begin "Rejected" means that a field or lot fails to meet the certification standards in this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Tuber units. new text end new text begin "Tuber units" means the separate pieces of one tuber that are planted consecutively in two or more hills in a row. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Winter testing. new text end new text begin "Winter testing" means growing out and visually inspecting a representative sample of tubers from each seed lot for stand, vigor, varietal purity, and disease. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.112, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Interstate cooperation. new text end new text begin In order to best use state resources, the commissioner may enter into agreements with other seed potato certification entities to carry out the purposes of sections 21.111 to 21.125. An agreement under this subdivision may provide for field inspections, shipping point inspections, winter testing, and other certification functions to be carried out by personnel employed by either the commissioner or other seed potato certification entities according to methods determined by the seed potato certification entities. The commissioner may extend seed potato certification services to a state where growers wish to grow certified seed potatoes and where the state does not have a seed potato certification program. Any agreement under this subdivision must be reported to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees responsible for the budget or policy of the seed potato inspection program and to the commissioner of management and budget. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.113, is amended to read: 21.113 new text begin SHIPPING POINT new text end CERTIFICATES deleted text begin OF INSPECTIONdeleted text end new text begin ; CERTIFICATES OF ORIGIN; AND BULK CERTIFICATESnew text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Shipping point inspections. new text end (a) The commissioner shall issue new text begin shipping point new text end certificates of inspection only when seed potatoes have been inspected while growing in the field and again after being harvested. deleted text begin (b) For seed potatoes produced in a lab deleted text end deleted text begin , the commissioner shall issue certificates of inspection only after: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the seed potato lab deleted text end deleted text begin facility and the lab's deleted text end deleted text begin records have been inspected; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the seed potatoes have been inspected after they have been harvested, removed, or released from the lab deleted text end deleted text begin . deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Certificates of inspection under this section shall show the varietal purity and the freedom from disease and physical injury of such potatoes and any other information as may be prescribed by deleted text begin rules adopted and published underdeleted text end sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122deleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end . new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Other certificates. new text end new text begin (a) The use of a certificate of origin requires the approval of the seller and the purchaser and must only be used for intrastate shipments between certified seed potato producers. The certificate of origin must contain information considered necessary by the commissioner and must at a minimum identify the producer, receiver, variety, classification, quantity, date of shipment, and lot of the seed potatoes. The limitation of warranty as described in paragraph (c) must not include any representation of the condition of the potatoes at the time of shipment. A certificate of origin must only be used for intrastate shipment if a shipping point inspection is not available. Use of a certificate of origin must be approved by the commissioner prior to shipment. new text end new text begin (b) A bulk certificate must include the date of issuance, class, grade, lot number, and approximate weight of the load. new text end new text begin (c) A certification does not represent a warranty of any kind, express or implied, including merchantability, as to the quality of the crop produced from the certified seed potatoes. A certification must only represent that the seed potatoes were produced, graded, sacked or placed in bulk, and inspected in accordance with this chapter. A certification under this subdivision must not include any representation of the condition of the potatoes at the time of shipment. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.115, is amended to read: 21.115 FEES; SEED POTATO INSPECTION ACCOUNT. The commissioner shall fix the fees for all inspections and certifications in such amounts as from time to time may be found necessary to pay the expenses of carrying out and enforcing the purposes of sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122deleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end , with a reasonable reserve, and shall require the same to be paid before such inspections or certifications are made. All moneys collected as fees or as penalties for violations of any of the provisions of such sections shall be paid into the agricultural fund and credited to the seed potato inspection account of the commissioner, which account is hereby created and appropriated for carrying out the purposes of sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122deleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end . Interest, if any, received on deposits of these moneys shall be credited to the account, and there shall be paid into this fund any sum provided by the legislature for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of such sections. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.117, is amended to read: 21.117 APPLICATIONS FOR INSPECTIONS; WITHDRAWALSnew text begin ; AMENDMENTSnew text end . (a) Any person may make application to the commissioner for inspection or certification of seed potatoes growing or to be grown. Upon receiving such application and the required fee and such other information as may be required, the commissioner shall cause such potatoes to be inspected or certified in accordance with the provisions of sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122 and the rules adopted and published thereunderdeleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end . (b) If a grower wishes to withdraw deleted text begin a field or labdeleted text end new text begin an applicationnew text end after having made new text begin a timely new text end application for inspection and such withdrawal is requested before the field or deleted text begin labdeleted text end new text begin facilitynew text end inspection has been made, the fee paid shall be refunded to said grower.new text begin A grower must submit a withdrawal request in writing and include a reason for withdrawal. A grower must remove withdrawn acres from production before the first field inspection.new text end new text begin (c) If a grower wishes to amend an application after submitting a timely application for inspection, the grower must submit the request in writing, including a reason for the amendment. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.119, is amended to read: 21.119 USE OF CERTAIN TERMS FORBIDDEN; EXCEPTIONS. It shall be unlawful to use or employ the term "certified" or the term "inspected," or any term or terms conveying a meaning substantially equivalent to the meaning of either of these terms, either orally or in writing, printing, marking, or otherwise in reference to or in connection with, or in advertising or characterizing or labeling seed potatoes or the containers thereof, unless such potatoes shall have been duly inspected and certified pursuant to the provisions of sections 21.111 to deleted text begin 21.122deleted text end new text begin 21.125new text end . Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.1195, is amended to read: 21.1195 MINIMUM STANDARDS FOR PLANTING. new text begin (a) new text end Seed potatoes may not be planted in the state in lots deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin totalingnew text end ten or more acres unless the seed meets the minimum disease standards prescribed by the commissioner. Seed potatoes may meet the standards by being certified in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the commissioner, or under the certification program of another state or province which, in the judgment of the commissioner, provides equivalent assurances of seed potato quality. Seed potatoes may be planted without certification if they have had at least field inspection as required for certified seed potatoes, have passed the field inspection standards of disease tolerance, and are free from ring rot. deleted text begin A person that plants seed potatoes in violation of this section is subject to a civil penalty of $20 per acre for each acre or part of an acre planted in violation of this section.deleted text end Failure to maintain complete and accurate records in accordance with this section deleted text begin or rules adopted by the commissioner is an additional violation resulting in a separate civil penalty of $200 for each failuredeleted text end new text begin is a violation and subject to enforcement under chapter 18Jnew text end . new text begin (b) new text end If there is not available to be planted in this state, in any year, a sufficient volume of potato seed meeting certified seed potato disease standards, in any or all varieties, the commissioner may, upon application by one or more growers, permit seed that does not comply with this section to be planted for that growing season if the seed does not pose a serious disease threat. new text begin (c) new text end Each grower shall keep records of each lot of seed potatoes planted. For each growing season, the records must include, by field, the varietynew text begin , planting location, number of acres planted,new text end and source of the seed potatoes. Each grower shall new text begin register fields and new text end file records as prescribed by the commissioner. All records must be made available for inspection by the commissioner or the commissioner's agents during normal business hours. new text begin (d) new text end In addition to the enforcement powers and penalties in this section, the commissioner may issue a subpoena to a grower in order to compel delivery of records which are required under this section. These subpoenas are enforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction. Sec. 28. new text begin [21.123] SEED POTATO CERTIFICATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin In order to produce certified seed potatoes, a grower must comply with the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) a grower must ensure that potatoes meet the tolerances prescribed by this chapter and the potatoes have been inspected by the commissioner while growing in a field; new text end new text begin (2) a grower must ensure that all potatoes planted on the grower's farm have been entered for certification by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (3) a grower must ensure that each lot is grown while physically separated from other lots. Markers must be visible to a person from any position in the field; new text end new text begin (4) a grower must submit an application for certification before June 16 each year on forms provided by the commissioner. The commissioner must charge a ten percent late registration fee to a grower who submitted an application postmarked after June 15 and before July 1. The commissioner may extend the deadline due to special circumstances, such as a natural disaster, that make it impractical or impossible for planting to be completed by the deadline and that affect an area or large number of growers. A grower must make a request for an extension in writing before June 16; new text end new text begin (5) an application for certification must include a North American Health Certificate and a shipping point certificate, bulk seed certificate, or certificate of origin. The commissioner may accept an incomplete application for certification; new text end new text begin (6) an application for certification must demonstrate that the seed potatoes being entered for certification originated from a class system in Minnesota or another state or province under the supervision of another certifying agency; and new text end new text begin (7) a grower must comply with sections 21.111 to 21.125. A grower's violation of sections 21.111 to 21.125 is cause for the commissioner to reject the grower's field or lot. A grower must not sell or label potatoes as certified seed potatoes when the potatoes were grown in a rejected field or lot. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certification process. new text end new text begin (a) As part of the certification process, the commissioner must visually inspect sample plants from each field and lot belonging to the grower, except that the commissioner is not required to visually inspect sample plants and tubers when certifying prenuclear class potatoes. new text end new text begin (b) For seed potato varieties that do not exhibit visible symptoms of a specific pathogen, the commissioner must subject the seed potatoes to laboratory tests to determine the level of a pathogen in a seed lot. Testing under this paragraph may occur during the growing season, the storage season, or winter testing. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may not accept an application for certification from a grower in a community or county without sufficient acreage for total inspection fee charges to cover the cost of wages and expenses of the commissioner to complete an inspection. The commissioner may make a determination of sufficient acreage under this paragraph before conducting an inspection as part of the certification process. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must not inspect a field for certification unless both the planted seed potato variety and the particular planted lot have been authorized by the commissioner. When considering the authorization of a particular seed potato variety for planting as certified seed potatoes, the commissioner must consider scientific evidence and the expert opinions of inspectors. new text end new text begin (e) The following classes of seed potatoes are eligible for planting as certified seed potatoes: Prenuclear (PN), Generation 1 (G1), Generation 2 (G2), Generation 3 (G3), Generation 4 (G4), Generation 5 (G5), and experimental class seed potatoes. The commissioner may authorize the planting of Certified (C) class or Generation 6 (G6) class seed potatoes if the commissioner determines that the seeds do not pose a serious threat of disease to the public. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bacterial ring rot or potato spindle tuber viroid. new text end new text begin If the commissioner finds the presence of bacterial ring rot or potato spindle tuber viroid in a field or lot, the commissioner must reject the entire field or lot. If the commissioner discovers a single plant in a field or a tuber in storage that is infected with bacterial ring rot or potato spindle tuber viroid, the commissioner must reject the entire field or lot where the plant was grown. If the commissioner has not found bacterial ring rot or potato spindle tuber viroid in a field or lot, the field or lot is not necessarily free from either disease. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Winter testing. new text end new text begin (a) In order to detect certain virus diseases, the commissioner must conduct winter testing of a sample from each class seeking eligibility for recertification, except PN and experimental classes. The commissioner must grow out and visually inspect a representative sample of tubers from each seed lot for stand, vigor, varietal purity, and disease. If, during a visual inspection, a plant shows signs of potato virus Y or potato leafroll virus, or if the plant is of a variety that does not express visual symptoms of infection, the commissioner must ensure that a sample of the plant is lab tested for potato virus Y and potato leafroll virus. The commissioner must determine whether a field or lot contains the threshold amount of disease permitted under section 21.124, subdivision 9. The commissioner must include any lot that passes winter testing in the approved list of certified seed lots eligible for recertification. new text end new text begin (b) If the commissioner determines that a winter test of a lot or field has a serious malfunction, the commissioner must base classification of the lot or field on summer field readings from the previous year or lab testing. new text end new text begin (c) Instead of winter testing a sample, the commissioner may accept comprehensive lab testing if the commissioner determines that special circumstances exist, such as a natural disaster, that would make submission of samples for inclusion in winter testing impractical or impossible. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must reject a field or lot if the commissioner determines that a large number of plants are missing from the field or lot due to disease. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must reject a field or lot if the commissioner determines that the field or lot contains a large number of weak plants. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner may reject a field or lot if the field or lot contains a large number of plants that have a mixture of variety. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Seed potato certification classes. new text end new text begin Seed potato certification classes must be differentiated by the potatoes' compliance with disease tolerances, varietal purity, and seed origin. Seed potato certification classes are: Prenuclear (PN), Generation 1 (G1), Generation 2 (G2), Generation 3 (G3), Generation 4 (G4), Generation 5 (G5), Generation 6 (G6), and Certified (C). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Experimental status. new text end new text begin (a) Lots from a breeder's seed that have not been tested and have not been determined to be virus-free are considered experimental. The commissioner must designate seedlings or numbered selections in experimental status as a class and determine requirements of that class. new text end new text begin (b) To obtain experimental status under this subdivision, an applicant must submit a written statement from the seedlings' or numbered selections' breeder, originator, or originator's designee verifying that the applicant has full and unrestricted rights to introduce the seedlings or numbered selections into the commercial market and that the applicant may apply to enter the seedlings or numbered selections into the certification system. The written statement must accompany the certification application submitted by the applicant. new text end new text begin (c) After reviewing the applicant's written statement and certification application, the commissioner may designate seedlings or numbered selections described in the application as having experimental status. new text end new text begin (d) After an applicant is notified by the commissioner that the seedlings or numbered selections have experimental status, the applicant must ensure that the seedlings or numbered selections are tagged with the word "EXPERIMENTAL." new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Protected varieties. new text end new text begin If an applicant seeks to enter a seed potato variety protected under the Plant Variety Protection Act Amendments of 1994 into the certification system, the applicant must submit a written statement from the breeder, originator, or originator's designee that the applicant has full and unrestricted rights to introduce the protected variety into the certification system. The applicant must ensure that the written statement accompanies the certification application for any protected seed potato variety. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Certification factors; field inspection. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must consider the following factors when conducting a field inspection pursuant to a certification application: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner must reject a field or lot if a large number of plants are missing due to disease; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner must reject a field or lot if the field or lot contains a large number of weak plants; new text end new text begin (3) the commissioner must inspect a field or lot for bacterial ring rot. The commissioner must reject a field or lot if the commissioner finds the presence of bacterial ring rot. If bacterial ring rot is present in a field or lot, the remaining crop is not eligible for certification planting; new text end new text begin (4) the commissioner must reject a field or lot if the field or lot contains potatoes with a level of disease higher than the acceptable tolerance for the disease for the potatoes' seed potato certification class according to section 21.124, subdivision 9; new text end new text begin (5) the commissioner must reject a field or lot if the field or lot contains a percentage of diseased plants that exceeds the acceptable percentage of disease listed in section 21.124 for the seed potato certification class; new text end new text begin (6) the commissioner must reject a field or lot if any of the following are present in the field or lot to such an extent that the commissioner is unable to complete a satisfactory inspection for diseases: early or late blight, blackleg or wilt of any kind, weeds, plant injury from insects, or chemical damage; and new text end new text begin (7) the commissioner must reject a field or lot if any other conditions are present to such an extent that the commissioner is unable to make a satisfactory inspection for diseases. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must determine that a field is ineligible for certification if cull piles are in such close vicinity to the field that it is likely that the field is contaminated. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must make at least two field inspections of a field during the growing season. The commissioner must conduct a final inspection of a field for bacterial ring rot during the time of year that symptoms of bacterial ring rot are most likely to be observed. If the commissioner is unable to conduct a final inspection under this paragraph due to management practices of the grower or for a reason that is out of the grower's control, such as a natural disaster, the grower must ensure that laboratory testing is conducted to maintain eligibility for certification. An additional inspection or additional laboratory testing may be necessary to meet phytosanitary requirements in established markets in another state or in a Canadian province. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Roguing. new text end new text begin If any of the diseases listed in section 21.124, subdivision 1, are present in a field in amounts greater than the maximum disease tolerance level, the grower must rogue the field and remove the infected plants before the final inspection by the commissioner. If a grower has completed roguing a field after tubers have formed, the grower must remove and destroy all tubers from rogued plants. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Storage. new text end new text begin (a) A grower must ensure that a lot is stored under conditions that prevent disease contamination. A grower must not store a lot in any warehouse where other potatoes are stored, unless the grower labels the lot according to paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) If more than one grower stores lots in the same warehouse, each grower must identify the grower's lots by labeling the bin containing the lot with the grower's name, the grower's address, the variety of potatoes in the bin, and the number of potatoes in the bin. new text end new text begin (c) If a grower plans to store a lot in a public warehouse or storage unit that is not directly under the grower's control, the grower must send a complete record of storage to the commissioner prior to storing the lot. The record must include the address and location of the public warehouse or storage unit, the variety of potatoes in each bin, and the number of potatoes in each bin. If a warehouse receipt for the lot is available, the grower must submit a copy of the warehouse receipt to the commissioner. If more than one grower stores lots in the same public warehouse or storage unit, the grower must label each lot according to paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) A grower must not use the same equipment for grading and handling lots of certified seed potatoes and other potatoes. If a grower has used the same equipment for grading and handling certified seed potatoes and other potatoes, the commissioner must reject the grower's lots. new text end new text begin (e) A firm that handles lots under contract must label each bin containing a lot with the name of the grower whose lots are being stored. A firm handling lots under contract must properly label and handle bins containing lots. A certification tag or bulk certificate must not be issued unless all bins are properly labeled according to this paragraph. new text end new text begin (f) By November 1 of each crop year, a grower must submit to the commissioner a completed storage and yield report for each lot on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may extend the deadline after November 1 due to special circumstances, such as a natural disaster, that would make it impractical or impossible for a grower to complete harvesting and storage by November 1 and that affect an area or a large number of growers. A grower must submit a written request for an extension to the commissioner before November 1 of the crop year for which the extension is sought. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Tags; bulk certificates. new text end new text begin (a) Once the commissioner has informed a grower that the grower's potatoes meet the certification requirements in sections 21.111 to 21.125, a grower may tag the potatoes using an approved tag indicating the grade of potatoes as blue-tag-certified seed potato grade, yellow-tag-certified seed potato grade, or white-tag-certified seed potato grade. A grower's name, the city where the farm is located, the potato variety, and the crop year must be printed on a tag under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) When fastening a tag to a potato sack, a grower must fasten the tag to the sack to form a seal at the time that the lot or shipment is prepared. new text end new text begin (c) A bulk certificate must include the date that the certificate was issued, class, grade, lot number, shipping point certificate number, and approximate weight of the lot. new text end new text begin (d) Only the person who grew the potatoes may order or print tags for the potatoes once the commissioner has informed the person that the potatoes meet certification requirements under sections 21.111 to 21.125. new text end new text begin (e) A grower may print a tag for potatoes if the grower has provided proof of each lot to the commissioner for review before using the tag. A tag printed by a grower must contain the following statement: "The quality and condition of each lot is only confirmed through a shipping point inspection certificate. This tag, without an accompanying shipping point inspection certificate, is not proof that the potatoes contained within have been duly inspected." new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Certified seed potato grades. new text end new text begin Certified seed potatoes must be classified by certified seed potato grades based on the number of physical defects of tubers. A grower must only use a certified seed potato grade for potatoes after a shipping point inspection of the potatoes has been completed. The following three grades of certified seed potatoes must be used for Minnesota-certified seed potatoes: new text end new text begin (1) the blue-tag-certified seed potato grade is the first grade of certified seed potatoes. The blue-tag-certified seed potato grade is stricter than other grades. The blue-tag-certified seed potato grade does not allow as many physical defects of tubers as other grades. A grower may use the blue-tag-certified seed potato grade for intrastate and interstate shipments of certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin (2) the yellow-tag-certified seed potato grade is the second grade of certified seed potatoes. The yellow-tag-certified seed potato grade allows more physical defects of tubers than the blue-tag-certified seed potato grade. A grower may use the yellow-tag-certified seed potato grade for intrastate and interstate shipments of certified seed potatoes; and new text end new text begin (3) the white-tag-certified seed potato grade is the third grade of certified seed potatoes. The number of physical defects that the white-tag-certified seed potato grade allows is determined by an agreement between the purchaser and seller of the certified seed potatoes. A grower may use the white-tag-certified seed potato grade for intrastate and interstate shipments of certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Grading. new text end new text begin (a) A grower must ensure that a lot is inspected at the shipping point if the lot requires a grade statement. new text end new text begin (b) If an inspection at the shipping point is impossible, a grower must request a grading inspection in transit. new text end new text begin (c) A grower must ensure that a bagged lot or shipment offered for sale and tagged with approved certification tags is contained in new even-weight sacks. new text end new text begin (d) A grower must ensure that a bulk shipment is identified with a bulk certificate. new text end new text begin (e) A grower must ensure that a bagged lot and bulk lot or shipment meets grade standards in section 21.125. new text end new text begin (f) A grower must recondition a lot or shipment that fails to meet the grade standards in section 21.125. new text end new text begin (g) If a lot or shipment fails to meet grade standards and is contained in sacks, a grower must remove approved certification tags from the lot or shipment before the lot or shipment may proceed to its destination. new text end new text begin (h) If a shipment is in bulk and fails to meet grade standards in section 21.125, a bulk certificate must not be issued. new text end new text begin (i) If a lot or shipment fails to meet grade standards, the shipper must bear the costs of reconditioning potatoes to meet the grade standards in section 21.125. new text end Sec. 29. new text begin [21.124] REQUIREMENTS FOR PRODUCTION OF DIFFERENT CLASSES OF CERTIFIED SEED POTATOES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prenuclear class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin (a) A lot grown as and intended to be prenuclear class certified seed potatoes must be grown from plants tested and shown to be free from the following pathogens: new text end new text begin (1) Clavibacter michiganensis ssp. sepedonicus (ring rot); new text end new text begin (2) Pectobacterium atrosepticum ssp. Atrosepticum, carotovora (blackleg); new text end new text begin (3) potato virus X; new text end new text begin (4) potato virus S; new text end new text begin (5) potato virus A; new text end new text begin (6) potato virus M; new text end new text begin (7) potato virus Y; new text end new text begin (8) potato spindle tuber viroid; and new text end new text begin (9) potato leafroll virus. new text end new text begin (b) When growing prenuclear class seed potatoes, a grower must ensure that each explant or tuber is tested for organisms for which testing is required by the state or province of destination. A grower must ensure that material in maintenance is tested during the year of producing prenuclear class seed potatoes. new text end new text begin (c) A grower must produce prenuclear class seed potatoes in a greenhouse, facility, or screenhouse under sanitary conditions, free from insects and weeds that can harbor or transmit potato diseases or other conditions that would allow possible disease contamination. A grower must ensure that a facility used for growing prenuclear seed potatoes is sufficiently insulated from insects by screens and double doors. The commissioner may inspect any facility or equipment used for growing, handling, and storing prenuclear class seed potatoes to verify that the facility or equipment complies with this paragraph. new text end new text begin (d) A grower must ensure that one percent of each lot or ten plants or tubers from each lot, whichever is greater, is tested during the growing season to verify that the crop is free from potato virus X, potato virus Y, potato leafroll virus, C. michiganensis, and P. atrosepticum. new text end new text begin (e) Prenuclear tubers may originate from greenhouse tubers for one year only if the greenhouse tubers have remained at the same growing operation and have remained isolated from field-grown tubers. new text end new text begin (f) Prenuclear class certified seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances for disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Generation 1 class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin (a) Generation 1 class seed potatoes must meet the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) the seed source must be either prenuclear tubers, clones, or plantlets; and new text end new text begin (2) tuber units or plantlets must be planted in identifiable family units. new text end new text begin (b) Subject to the commissioner's approval, lots in Generation 1 class may be exempt from winter testing requirements if leaves collected during the growing season are laboratory tested and shown to be within the allowable tolerance of potato virus X, potato virus Y, and other pathogens identified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Each lot must be stored in an individual identifiable unit. new text end new text begin (d) Generation 1 seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances for disease and varietal mixture for seed potatoes in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Generation 2 class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Generation 2 class seed potatoes must originate from Generation 1 class seed potatoes. Generation 2 class seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances of disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Generation 3 class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Generation 3 class seed potatoes must originate from Generation 2 class seed potatoes. Generation 3 class seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances of disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Generation 4 class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Generation 4 class seed potatoes must originate from Generation 3 class seed potatoes. Generation 4 class seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances for disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Generation 5 class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Generation 5 class seed potatoes must originate from Generation 4 class seed potatoes. Generation 5 class seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances for disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Generation 6 class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Generation 6 class seed potatoes must originate from Generation 5 class seed potatoes. Generation 6 class seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances for disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Certified class certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Certified class seed potatoes must originate from generation classes of seed potatoes. Certified class seed potatoes must not contain more than the allowable tolerances for disease and varietal mixture in subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Allowable tolerances for diseases and varietal mixture by generation class. new text end new text begin The numbers represent the percentage of potatoes that may be affected out of an individual lot. new text end new text begin PN new text end new text begin G1 new text end new text begin G2 new text end new text begin G3 new text end new text begin G4 new text end new text begin G5 new text end new text begin G6 new text end new text begin C new text end new text begin Tolerances: new text end new text begin Severe Mosaic from potato virus Y, A, M, X, and/or S new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 1 new text end new text begin Leafroll new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 1 new text end new text begin Total new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 1 new text end new text begin Other viruses new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin Mycoplasms (haywire, witches broom, yellow dwarf) new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin Total new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin Blackleg new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.2 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 1 new text end new text begin exc. new text end new text begin exc. new text end new text begin exc. new text end new text begin Varietal mixture new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0.1 new text end new text begin 0.1 new text end new text begin 0.1 new text end new text begin 0.2 new text end new text begin 0.2 new text end new text begin Ring Rot and Spindle Tuber new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin Winter Test: new text end new text begin Virus or expressing symptoms of chemical damage new text end new text begin - new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end new text begin 0.5 new text end Sec. 30. new text begin [21.125] MINNESOTA CERTIFIED SEED POTATO GRADES AND TOLERANCES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Certified seed potato grading. new text end new text begin Potatoes must meet the requirements of sections 21.111 to 21.125 to be graded as certified seed potatoes. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Damage" means any defect or combination of defects that materially affects the appearance of the individual potato, or that cannot be removed without a loss of more than five percent of the total weight of the potato, including the peel covering the defective area. new text end new text begin (c) "Diameter" means the greatest dimension at right angles to the longitudinal axis. Diameter means the long axis. new text end new text begin (d) "Dry rot" means decaying tissue that is dry. new text end new text begin (e) "Fairly clean" means that the individual potato is reasonably free from dirt, staining, or other foreign matter. new text end new text begin (f) "Fairly well-shaped" means that the individual potato is not materially pointed, dumbbell-shaped, or otherwise ill-formed. new text end new text begin (g) "Mature" means that the outer skin does not loosen or feather readily during the ordinary methods of handling. new text end new text begin (h) "Serious damage" means any defect or combination of defects that seriously affects the appearance of the individual potato or that cannot be removed without a loss of more than ten percent of the total weight of the potato, including the peel covering the defective area. new text end new text begin (i) "Slightly dirty" means the appearance is not materially affected by dirt, staining, or other foreign matter. new text end new text begin (j) "Soft rot" or "wet breakdown" means any soft, mushy, or leaky condition of potato tissues. new text end new text begin (k) "Well-shaped" means the normal shape for a variety. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Damage. new text end new text begin The commissioner must find that one or more of the following defects constitutes damage: new text end new text begin (1) a russet scab that materially detracts from the appearance of a potato; new text end new text begin (2) second growth or growth cracks that materially affect the appearance of an individual potato; new text end new text begin (3) air cracks when removal of the air cracks causes a loss of more than five percent of the total weight of a potato; new text end new text begin (4) a potato that is more than moderately shriveled, spongy, or flabby; new text end new text begin (5) an individual potato that has sprouts over one inch in length; new text end new text begin (6) a surface scab, powdery scab, or pitted scab that covers more than five percent of the surface of a potato or a surface scab, powdery scab, or pitted scab that, when removed, causes a potato to lose more than five percent of the potato's total weight, including peel covering a defective area of the potato; or new text end new text begin (7) more than 50 percent of a potato's surface contains scattered, lightly caked soil or more than 15 percent of a potato's surface is badly caked with soil. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Serious damage. new text end new text begin The commissioner must find that one or more of the following defects constitutes serious damage: new text end new text begin (1) a russet scab that seriously detracts from the appearance of a potato; new text end new text begin (2) the appearance of a potato is seriously affected by caked or smeared dirt or other foreign matter; new text end new text begin (3) both ends of a potato are cut or clipped, more than an estimated one-fourth of a potato is cut away from one end, or a remaining portion of a clipped potato weighs less than six ounces; new text end new text begin (4) one or more cuts that seriously affect the appearance of a potato or that cannot be removed without the loss of more than ten percent of a potato's total weight, including peel covering the defective area; new text end new text begin (5) a potato that is excessively shriveled, spongy, or flabby; new text end new text begin (6) a surface scab, powdery scab, or pitted scab that covers more than 25 percent of the surface of a potato or a surface scab, powdery scab, or pitted scab that, when removed, causes a loss of more than ten percent of a potato's total weight, including peel covering the defective area; or new text end new text begin (7) wireworm or air cracks that, when removed, cause a loss of more than ten percent of a potato's total weight. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Application of tolerance. new text end new text begin If the average of an entire lot is within the disease tolerances specified for the grade in section 21.124, subdivision 9, an individual container in the lot may contain no more than double the disease tolerance specified in section 21.124, subdivision 9, except that sprouts, at least one defective specimen with a defect other than bacterial ring rot, and one off size specimen is permitted. This subdivision does not apply to bulk conveyances. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Condition after transit. new text end new text begin Deterioration that developed in transit must affect the condition of potatoes. Deterioration that developed in transit must not affect the grade of potatoes. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Minnesota blue-tag-certified seed potato grade. new text end new text begin (a) To be graded as Minnesota blue-tag-certified seed potatoes, potatoes must meet the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) at the time of the shipping point inspection, potatoes must be of one variety; unwashed; fairly well-shaped; free from bacterial ring rot, late blight, freezing, black heart, and soft rot or wet breakdown; free from damage caused by soil or other foreign matter, second growth, air cracks, cuts, shriveling, sprouts, pitted scabs, surface scabs, powdery scabs, russet scabs, dry rot, other diseases, insects or worms, mechanical or other means, or flattened or depressed areas with underlying flesh discoloration; and free from serious damage caused by hollow heart, wireworm, growth cracks, or internal discoloration other than hollow heart. Sunburn and silver scurf must not be considered factors that affect the grading of potatoes. This clause does not apply to hollow heart if the potatoes are labeled "hollow heart exempt" on the affixed tag or accompanying certificate; and new text end new text begin (2) for round or intermediate shaped varieties, the maximum potato size is 12 ounces (340.2 grams) and, unless otherwise specified, the minimum size must not be less than 1-1/2 inches (38.1 millimeters) in diameter. For long varieties, the maximum size is 14 ounces (396.9 grams) and, unless otherwise specified, the minimum size must not be less than 1-1/2 inches (38.1 millimeters) in diameter. For all varieties, the minimum diameter for size "B" must not be less than 1-1/2 inches (38.1 millimeters) and the maximum size must not be more than 2-1/4 inches (57.1 millimeters) in diameter. The department may grade potatoes that do not meet the maximum and minimum size specifications as Minnesota blue-tag-certified seed potatoes if the buyer agrees to accept potatoes of alternate size specifications from the grower and the specifications are listed on the affixed tag or accompanying bulk certificate issued by the department. new text end new text begin (b) To allow for variations incident to proper grading and handling, the following lot tolerances are permitted: new text end new text begin (1) for defects: new text end new text begin (i) up to ten percent of a lot may be seriously damaged by hollow heart, unless labeled "hollow heart exempt" on the affixed tag or accompanying certificate; new text end new text begin (ii) up to five percent of a lot may be seriously damaged by internal discoloration due to causes other than hollow heart; new text end new text begin (iii) up to ten percent of a lot may be damaged by soil or other foreign matter; new text end new text begin (iv) up to 20 percent of a lot may be damaged by sprouts; new text end new text begin (v) up to ten percent of a lot may be seriously damaged by wireworm; new text end new text begin (vi) for potatoes that fail to meet the remaining requirements of the potatoes' grade, a lot may contain up to a total of six percent of the following defects combined and must not contain more than the following percentage of defects: new text end new text begin (A) soft rot, frozen, or wet breakdown, 0.5 percent; new text end new text begin (B) damage by surface scab, powdery scab, or pitted scab, 2.0 percent; new text end new text begin (C) damage by dry rot, 2.0 percent, of which not more than 1.0 percent is late blight tuber rot; new text end new text begin (D) bacterial ring rot, 0.0 percent; and new text end new text begin (E) late blight tuber rot, 1.0 percent; and new text end new text begin (vii) the presence of the following does not affect seed quality and must not be scored against the potatoes' grade: new text end new text begin (A) brown discoloration following skinning; new text end new text begin (B) dried stems; new text end new text begin (C) flattened or depressed areas showing no underlying flesh discoloration; new text end new text begin (D) greening; new text end new text begin (E) sunburn; new text end new text begin (F) skin checks; and new text end new text begin (G) silver scurf; and new text end new text begin (2) for off size: new text end new text begin (i) up to five percent of potatoes may fail to meet the required or specified minimum size; and new text end new text begin (ii) up to ten percent of potatoes may fail to meet the required maximum size. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Minnesota yellow-tag-certified seed potato grade. new text end new text begin (a) To be graded as Minnesota yellow-tag-certified seed potatoes, potatoes must meet the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) at the time of the shipping point inspection, the potatoes must be of one variety; unwashed; fairly well-shaped; free from bacterial ring rot, late blight, freezing, black heart, and soft rot or wet breakdown; free from damage caused by second growth, air cracks, cuts, shriveling, pitted scabs, surface scabs, powdery scabs, dry rot, other diseases, insects or worms, or mechanical means or other means; and free from serious damage caused by soil or other foreign matter, hollow heart, wireworm, growth cracks, russet scabs, or internal discoloration other than hollow heart. Sunburn and silver scurf must not be considered factors that affect the grading of potatoes. This clause does not apply to hollow heart if labeled "hollow heart exempt" on the affixed tag or accompanying certificate; and new text end new text begin (2) for all varieties, the maximum potato size is 14 ounces (396.9 grams) and the minimum size is 1-1/2 inch (38.1 millimeter) in diameter. For all varieties, the minimum diameter for size "B" must not be less than 1-1/2 inches (38.1 millimeters) and the maximum diameter must not be more than 2-1/4 inches (57.1 millimeters). The department may grade potatoes that do not meet the maximum and minimum size specifications as Minnesota yellow-tag-certified seed potatoes if the buyer agrees to accept potatoes with alternate size specifications from the grower and the size specifications are listed on the affixed tag or accompanying bulk certificate issued by the department. new text end new text begin (b) To allow for variations incident to proper grading and handling, the following lot tolerances are permitted: new text end new text begin (1) for defects: new text end new text begin (i) up to 20 percent of potatoes may be seriously damaged by hollow heart, unless labeled "hollow heart exempt" on the affixed tag or accompanying certificate; new text end new text begin (ii) up to five percent of potatoes may be seriously damaged by internal discoloration due to a cause other than hollow heart; new text end new text begin (iii) up to ten percent of potatoes may be seriously damaged by soil or other foreign matter; new text end new text begin (iv) up to ten percent of potatoes may be seriously damaged by wireworm; new text end new text begin (v) up to 20 percent of a lot may have defects if the potatoes fail to meet the remaining requirements of the grade. Of the 20 percent of defects allowed, a lot may contain a total of six percent of the following defects combined and must not contain more than the following percentage of defects: new text end new text begin (A) soft rot, frozen, or wet breakdown, 0.5 percent; new text end new text begin (B) damage by surface scab, powdery scab, or pitted scab, 5.0 percent; new text end new text begin (C) damage by dry rot, 2.0 percent, of which not more than 1.0 percent is late blight tuber rot; new text end new text begin (D) bacterial ring rot, 0.0 percent; and new text end new text begin (E) late blight tuber rot, 1.0 percent; and new text end new text begin (vi) the presence of the following does not affect seed quality and must not be scored against the grade: new text end new text begin (A) brown discoloration following skinning; new text end new text begin (B) dried stems; new text end new text begin (C) flattened or depressed areas showing no underlying flesh discoloration; new text end new text begin (D) greening; new text end new text begin (E) sunburn; new text end new text begin (F) skin checks; new text end new text begin (G) silver scurf; and new text end new text begin (H) sprouts; and new text end new text begin (2) for off size: new text end new text begin (i) five percent for potatoes that fail to meet the required or specified minimum size; and new text end new text begin (ii) ten percent for potatoes that fail to meet the required maximum size. new text end new text begin (c) The potatoes must be fairly well-shaped, with an exception for long varieties when specified as "except for shape." When specified as "except for shape," the tubers may be misshapen. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Minnesota white-tag-certified seed potato grade. new text end new text begin Minnesota white-tag-certified seed potato grade consists of certified seed potatoes that are graded according to agreement between the seller and the purchaser as to size and defects, except that not more than one-half percent of soft rot, frozen, or wet breakdown and two percent dry rot, of which not more than one percent late blight tuber rot is allowed. new text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.891, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Seed fee permits. (a) A labeler who wishes to sell seed in Minnesota must comply with section 21.89, subdivisions 1 and 2, and the procedures in this subdivision. Each labeler who wishes to sell seed in Minnesota must apply to the commissioner to obtain a permit. The application must contain the name and address of the applicant, the application date, and the name and title of the applicant's contact person. Permit fees are based on the initial sale of seed in Minnesota. (b) The application for a seed permit covered by section 21.89, subdivision 2, clause (1), must be accompanied by an application fee of $75. (c) The application for a seed permit covered by section 21.89, subdivision 2, clause (2), must be accompanied by an application fee based on the level of annual gross sales as follows: (1) for gross sales of $0 to $25,000, the annual permit fee is $75; (2) for gross sales of $25,001 to $50,000, the annual permit fee is $150; (3) for gross sales of $50,001 to $100,000, the annual permit fee is $300; (4) for gross sales of $100,001 to $250,000, the annual permit fee is $750; (5) for gross sales of $250,001 to $500,000, the annual permit fee is $1,500; (6) for gross sales of $500,001 to $1,000,000, the annual permit fee is $3,000; and (7) for gross sales of $1,000,001 and above, the annual permit fee is $4,500. (d) The application for a seed permit covered by section 21.89, subdivision 2, clause (3), must be accompanied by an application fee of $75. Labelers holding seed fee permits covered under this paragraph need not apply for a new permit or pay the application fee. Under this permit category, the fees for the following kinds of agricultural seed sold either in bulk or containers are: (1) oats, wheat, and barley, 9 cents per hundredweight; (2) rye, field beans, buckwheat, and flax, 12 cents per hundredweight; (3) field corn, 17 cents per 80,000 seed unit; (4) forage, hemp, lawn and turf grasses, and legumes, 69 cents per hundredweight; (5) sunflower, $1.96 per hundredweight; (6) sugar beet, 12 cents per 100,000 seed unit; (7) soybeans, 7.5 cents per 140,000 seed unit; (8) for any agricultural seed not listed in clauses (1) to (7), the fee for the crop most closely resembling it in normal planting rate applies; and (9) for native grasses and wildflower seed, $1 per hundredweight. (e) If, for reasons beyond the control and knowledge of the labeler, seed is shipped into Minnesota by a person other than the labeler, the responsibility for the seed fees are transferred to the shipper. An application for a transfer of this responsibility must be made to the commissioner. Upon approval by the commissioner of the transfer, the shipper is responsible for payment of the seed permit fees. (f) Seed permit fees may be included in the cost of the seed either as a hidden cost or as a line item cost on each invoice for seed sold. To identify the fee on an invoice, the words "Minnesota seed permit fees" must be used. (g) All seed fee permit holders must file semiannual reports with the commissioner, even if no seed was sold during the reporting period. Each semiannual report must be submitted within 30 days of the end of each reporting period. The reporting periods deleted text begin are October 1 to March 31 and April 1 to September 30 of each year or July 1 to December 31 and January 1 to June 30 of each yeardeleted text end new text begin must be determined by the commissioner and communicated annually to permit holdersnew text end . Permit holders may change their reporting periods with the approval of the commissioner. (h) The holder of a seed fee permit must pay fees on all seed for which the permit holder is the labeler and which are covered by sections 21.80 to 21.92 and sold during the reporting period. (i) If a seed fee permit holder fails to submit a semiannual report and pay the seed fee within 30 days after the end of each reporting period, the commissioner shall assess a penalty of $100 or eight percent, calculated on an annual basis, of the fee due, whichever is greater, but no more than $500 for each late semiannual report. A $15 penalty must be charged when the semiannual report is late, even if no fee is due for the reporting period. Seed fee permits may be revoked for failure to comply with the applicable provisions of this paragraph or the Minnesota seed law. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 28A.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application; date of issuance. (a) Except as provided under section 28A.152, no person deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin maynew text end engage in the business of manufacturing, processing, selling, handling, or storing food without having first obtained from the commissioner a license for doing such business. Applications for such license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be made to the commissioner in such manner and time as required and upon such forms as provided by the commissioner and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end contain the name and address of the applicant, address or description of each place of business, and the nature of the business to be conducted at each place, and such other pertinent information as the commissioner may require. (b) An applicant for a license must submit a nonrefundable application fee of $50 with each license application. The fee under this paragraph does not apply to annual license renewals. The fee under this paragraph is not required for applications to operate solely as a special event food stand or custom exempt food handler. (c) A food handler license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be issued for the period January 1 to December 31 and deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be renewed thereafter by the licensee on or before January 1 of each year, except that: (1) retail and wholesale food handler licenses issued for the period of July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, must be renewed on or before July 1, 2026, for the period of July 1, 2026, to December 31, 2026. The renewal fee for the period of July 1, 2026, to December 31, 2026, is one-half of the fee for a food handler specified in section 28A.08, subdivision 3; (2) licenses for all mobile food concession units and retail mobile units must be issued for the period April 1 to March 31, and must be renewed thereafter by the licensee on or before April 1 of each year. A license issued for a temporary food concession stand must have a license issuance and renewal date consistent with appropriate statutory provisions; and (3) a license for a food handler operating only at the State Fair must be issued for the period of July 1 to June 30 and must be renewed thereafter by the licensee on or before July 1 of each year. (d) A penalty for late renewal under paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end must be assessed in accordance with section 28A.08. (e) A custom exempt food handler license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be issued for the period July 1 to June 30 and must be renewed thereafter by the licensee on or before July 1 each year. The custom exempt food handler license is for businesses that only conduct custom exempt operations and mark all products as "Not For Sale." Food handlers that conduct retail exempt operations or other operations other than custom exempt processing or slaughter are not eligible for this license. (f) On a quarterly basis during the licensing period, the commissioner must prorate the fee for an initial license issued under this chapter, except thatnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a person applying for a new license up to 14 calendar days before the effective date of the new license period under paragraph (c) must be issued a license for the 14 days and the next license year as a single license and pay a single license fee as if the 14 days were part of the upcoming license perioddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) a person applying for a license to operate as a special event food stand must pay the entire fee specified in section 28A.08, subdivision 3, regardless of when the application is filed. new text end Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 28A.0752, is amended to read: 28A.0752 DELEGATION OF POWERS AND DUTIES. Subdivision 1. Agreements to perform duties of commissioner. (a) new text begin The commissioner may enter into new text end agreements to delegate deleted text begin licensing and inspectiondeleted text end dutiesnew text begin of the commissioner to community health boardsnew text end pertaining to deleted text begin retaildeleted text end food handlers deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin whose primary mode of business is to sell or to process and sell food directly to the ultimate consumer. An agreement under this section maynew text end include new text begin duties of new text end licensing, inspection, reporting, and enforcement deleted text begin dutiesdeleted text end authorized under deleted text begin sectionsdeleted text end new text begin this chapter and chapters 29 and 30; sectionnew text end 17.04deleted text begin , 29.21, 29.23, 29.235, 29.236, 29.237, 29.24, 29.25, 29.26, 29.27, and 30.49,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end appropriate sections of the Minnesota Food Law, chapters 31 and 34Adeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and applicable Minnesota food rules. (b) Agreementsnew text begin under this sectionnew text end are subject to subdivision 3. (c) deleted text begin This subdivision does not affect agreements entered into under section 28A.075 or current cooperative agreements which base inspections and licensing responsibility on the firm's most predominant mode of business.deleted text end new text begin The commissioner must not delegate duties under this section pertaining to custom exempt food handlers and food handlers inspected under the state meat inspection program under chapter 31A.new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must not delegate duties under this section pertaining to food handlers whose principal mode of business is to sell food to other business entities or establishments for resale. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must not delegate duties under this section pertaining to food handlers who conduct activities regulated under Code of Federal Regulations, title 21, part 111; 112; 113; 114; 117, subpart C; 120; or 123. new text end Subd. 2. Approval of agreements. new text begin (a) new text end An agreement new text begin under this section new text end to delegate deleted text begin licensing and inspection of retail food handlersdeleted text end new text begin dutiesnew text end to a community health board must be approved by the commissioner deleted text begin and is subject to subdivision 3deleted text end . new text begin (b) An agreement to delegate the commissioner's duties to a designated agent established before January 1, 2025, remains in effect if the designated agent's performance continues to meet the standards necessary to substitute for the commissioner's duties and complies with the requirements of subdivisions 1 and 3. new text end Subd. 3. Terms of agreements. (a) Agreements authorized under this section must be in writing and signed by the deleted text begin delegating authoritydeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end and the designated agent. (b) deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Annew text end agreement new text begin under this section new text end must list criterianew text begin thatnew text end the deleted text begin delegating authoritydeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end will use to determine if the designated agent's performance meets appropriate standards and is sufficient to replace performance by the deleted text begin delegating authoritydeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end . (c) deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Annew text end agreement new text begin under this section new text end may specify minimum staff requirements and qualifications, set procedures for the assessment of costs, and provide for termination procedures if the deleted text begin delegating authoritydeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end determines that the designated agent has failed to comply with the agreement. new text begin (d) A designated agent must operate according to the requirements of section 28A.06. new text end new text begin (e) By December 31, 2028, a designated agent that entered into an agreement to delegate the commissioner's duties to the designated agent before January 1, 2025, must comply with section 28A.06. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The deleted text begin delegating authoritydeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end and the designated agent are required to perform inspections utilizing the Minnesota Food Code's minimum and maximum standards. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A designated agent must not perform licensing, inspection, new text begin reporting, new text end or enforcement duties under deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin annew text end agreement new text begin under this section new text end innew text begin anew text end territory outside its jurisdiction unless approved by the commissioner and governing body for that territory through a separate agreement. new text begin (h) A designated agent may charge a fee to recover the estimated costs of performing duties according to terms of an agreement under this section if the duties involve enforcing the Minnesota Food Law and applicable Minnesota food rules. The fee charged by the designated agent must be fair, reasonable, and proportionate to the actual cost of the duties performed by the designated agent. A designated agent must only use a fee under this paragraph to cover the costs of performing duties according to terms of the agreement under this section. new text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end The scope of agreements established under this section is limited to duties and responsibilities agreed upon by the parties. The agreement may provide for automatic renewal and for notice of intent to terminate by either party. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end During the life of deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin annew text end agreementnew text begin under this sectionnew text end , the deleted text begin delegating authority shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner mustnew text end not perform duties that the designated agent is required to perform under the agreement, except inspections necessary to determine compliance with the agreement and this section or as agreed to by the parties. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end The deleted text begin delegating authority shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner mustnew text end consult with, advise, and assist a designated agent in the performance of its duties under the agreement. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end This section does not alter the responsibility of the deleted text begin delegating authoritydeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end for the performance of duties specified by law and rule. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 28A.08, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Fees effective August 1, 2025. Penalties Type of food handler Risk Category License Fee Late Renewal NoLicense 1. Custom exempt food handler (a) Having $50,000 or less gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $135 $45 $90 (b) Having $50,001 to $125,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $200 $67 $133 (c) Having $125,001 to $500,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $370 $123 $247 (d) Having $500,001 to $1,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $475 $158 $317 (e) Having $1,000,001 to $5,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $1,350 $450 $900 (f) Having $5,000,001 to $10,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $1,750 $583 $1,167 (g) Having $10,000,001 to $15,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $2,150 $717 $1,433 (h) Having $15,000,001 to $20,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $2,550 $849 $1,700 (i) Having $20,000,001 to $25,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $2,950 $984 $1,967 (j) Having over $25,000,001 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $3,350 $1,117 $2,233 2. Food handler (a) Having gross sales of only prepackaged nonperishable food of less than $30,000 for the immediately previous license or fiscal year and filing a statement with the commissioner $90 $30 $60 (b) Having gross sales or service of less than $50,000 for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $285$195$135 $95$65$45 $190$130$90 (c) Having $50,001 to $125,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $350$260$200 $117$87$67 $233$173$133 (d) Having $125,001 to $250,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $415$350$265 $138$117$88 $277$233$177 (e) Having $250,001 to $500,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $520$430$370 $173$143$123 $347$287$247 (f) Having $500,001 to $1,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $625$535$475 $208$178$158 $417$357$317 (g) Having $1,000,001 to $5,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $1,500$1,425$1,350 $500$475$450 $1,000$950$900 (h) Having $5,000,001 to $10,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $1,900$1,825$1,750 $633$608$583 $1,267$1,217$1,167 (i) Having $10,000,001 to $15,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $2,300$2,225$2,150 $767$742$717 $1,533$1,483$1,433 (j) Having $15,000,001 to $20,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $2,700$2,625$2,550 $900$875$849 $1,800$1,750$1,700 (k) Having $20,000,001 to $25,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $3,100$3,025$2,950 $1,033$1,008$984 $2,067$2,017$1,967 (l) Having $25,000,001 to $50,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $3,500$3,425$3,350 $1,167$1,142$1,117 $2,333$2,283$2,233 (m) Having $50,000,001 to $100,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $4,000$3,925$3,850 $1,334$1,309$1,284 $2,667$2,617$2,567 (n) Having $100,000,001 or more gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year HighMediumLow $4,500$4,425$4,350 $1,500$1,475$1,450 $3,000$2,950$2,900 3. Food handler operating under authority of this chapter solely as a special event food stand as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 157.15 $75 deleted text begin $25 deleted text end $50 4. Meat or poultry processing solely under supervision of the U.S. Department of Agriculture (a) Having gross sales or service of less than $125,000 for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $190 $63 $127 (b) Having $125,001 to $250,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $365 $122 $243 (c) Having $250,001 to $500,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $450 $150 $300 (d) Having $500,001 to $1,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $565 $188 $377 (e) Having $1,000,001 to $5,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $725 $241 $483 (f) Having $5,000,001 to $10,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $885 $295 $590 (g) Having $10,000,001 to $15,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $1,305 $435 $807 (h) Having $15,000,001 to $20,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $1,515 $505 $1,010 (i) Having $20,000,001 to $25,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $1,745 $582 $1,163 (j) Having $25,000,001 to $50,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $1,975 $658 $1,317 (k) Having $50,000,001 to $100,000,000 gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $2,215 $738 $1,477 (l) Having $100,000,001 or more gross sales or service for the immediately previous license or fiscal year $2,465 $822 $1,643 Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 32D.30, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reporting. No later than deleted text begin July 1deleted text end new text begin September 15 of new text end each new text begin even-numbered new text end year, the commissioner must submit a detailed accomplishment report and work plan detailing future plans for, and the actual and anticipated accomplishments from, expenditures under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance. If the commissioner significantly modifies a submitted work plan deleted text begin during the fiscal yeardeleted text end , the commissioner must notify the chairs and ranking minority members. Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.19, is amended to read: 41A.19 REPORT; INCENTIVE PROGRAMS. deleted text begin By January 15deleted text end Each year, the commissioner shall report on the incentive programs under sections 41A.16, 41A.17, 41A.18, and 41A.20 to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and agriculture policy and financenew text begin in the report under section 41A.12, subdivision 3new text end . The report shall include information on production and incentive expenditures under the programs. Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41B.048, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Establishment. The authority shall establish and implement an agroforestry loan program to help finance the production of short rotation woody cropsnew text begin , agroforestry crops, agroforestry systems, such as silvopasture and alley systems, and other systemsnew text end . Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41B.048, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. new text begin (b) "Agroforestry" has the meaning given in section 17.458, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Agroforestry system" means an agricultural production system that integrates trees, shrubs, or other woody perennial species or animals into the system, with the intention to harvest wood, food, feed, medicinal products, or other products from the system. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end "Growing cycle" means the number of years from planting to harvest. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (e) new text end "Harvest" means the day that the crop arrives at the scale of the buyer of the crop. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (f) new text end "Short rotation woody crops" or "crop" means hybrid poplar and other woody plants that are harvested for their fiber within 15 years of planting. Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41B.048, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Eligibilitynew text begin for growers of short rotation woody cropsnew text end . To be eligible for this programnew text begin ,new text end a borrower must: (1) be a resident of Minnesota or any entity eligible to own farm land under section 500.24; (2) be or plan to become a grower of short rotation woody crops on agricultural land that is suitable for the profitable production of short rotation woody crops; (3) be a member of a producer-owned cooperative that will contract to market the short rotation woody crop to be planted by the borrower; (4) demonstrate an ability to repay the loan; (5) not receive assistance under this program for more than $150,000 in the producer's lifetime; (6) agree to work with appropriate local, state, and federal agencies, and the marketing cooperative, to develop an acceptable establishment and maintenance plan; (7) agree not to plant short-rotation woody crops within one-quarter of a mile of state or federally protected prairie; and (8) meet any other requirements the authority may impose by administrative procedure or by rule. Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41B.048, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Eligibility for agroforestry systems and practices. new text end new text begin To be eligible for this program, a borrower must: new text end new text begin (1) be a resident of Minnesota or any entity eligible to own farm land under section 500.24; new text end new text begin (2) be a farmer or agricultural landowner implementing: (i) the use of an agroforestry system, such as a silvopasture or an alley system, on agricultural land; or (ii) the use of agroforestry practices, such as biochar processing, on agricultural land; new text end new text begin (3) demonstrate an ability to repay the loan; new text end new text begin (4) not receive assistance under this program for more than $150,000 in the producer's lifetime; and new text end new text begin (5) meet any other requirements the authority may impose by administrative procedure or by rule. new text end Sec. 41. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41B.048, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Loans for agroforestry systems and practices. new text end new text begin (a) The authority may participate with eligible lenders in agroforestry loans to farmers and agricultural landowners who are eligible under subdivision 5a. The authority's participation is limited to 45 percent or $75,000 of total accumulative principal per loan. new text end new text begin (b) The interest rates and repayment terms of the authority's participation interest may differ from those of the lender's retained portion of the loan. new text end new text begin (c) Standards for loan amortization must be set by the Rural Finance Authority and must not exceed ten years. new text end new text begin (d) Security for the loan must be a personal note executed by the borrower and whatever other security is required by the eligible lender or the authority. new text end new text begin (e) The authority may prescribe forms and establish an application process for applicants to apply for a loan. new text end new text begin (f) The authority may impose a reasonable, nonrefundable application fee for each application for an agroforestry loan under this program. The authority may review the fee annually and make adjustments as necessary. The initial application fee is $50. Application fees received by the authority must be deposited in the Rural Finance Authority administrative account established in section 41B.03. new text end new text begin (g) Loans under this program must be made using money in the revolving loan account established in section 41B.06. new text end new text begin (h) All repayments of financial assistance granted under this section, including principal and interest, must be deposited into the revolving loan account established under section 41B.06. new text end new text begin (i) The interest payable on loans for the agroforestry loan program must be at a rate determined by the authority. new text end Sec. 42. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 18K.02, subdivision 7; 18K.03, subdivision 2; and 28A.075, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08002 18K.02 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 7. Processor. "Processor" means a person or business that converts raw hemp into a product. 18K.03 AGRICULTURAL CROP; POSSESSION AUTHORIZED. Subd. 2. Sale to medical cannabis manufacturers. A licensee under this chapter may sell hemp products derived from industrial hemp grown in this state to medical cannabis manufacturers as authorized under sections 152.22 to 152.37. 28A.075 DELEGATION TO LOCAL COMMUNITY HEALTH BOARD. (a) At the request of a local community health board that licensed and inspected grocery and convenience stores on January 1, 1999, the commissioner must enter into agreements before January 1, 2001, with local community health boards to delegate to the appropriate local community health board the licensing and inspection duties of the commissioner pertaining to retail food handlers that are grocery or convenience stores. At the request of a local community health board that licensed and inspected part of any grocery or convenience store on January 1, 1999, the commissioner must enter into agreements before July 1, 2001, with local community health boards to delegate to the appropriate local community health board the licensing and inspection duties of the commissioner pertaining to retail food handlers that are grocery or convenience stores. At any time thereafter, the commissioner may enter into an agreement with a local community health board that licensed and inspected all or part of any grocery or convenience store on January 1, 1999, to delegate to the appropriate local community health board the licensing and inspection duties of the commissioner pertaining to retail food handlers such as grocery or convenience stores. Retail food handlers inspected under the state meat inspection program of chapter 31A are exempt from delegation. (b) A local community health board must adopt an ordinance consistent with the Minnesota Food Code, Minnesota Rules, chapter 4626, for all of its jurisdiction to regulate retail food handlers and the ordinance (Food Code) must not be in conflict with standards set in law or rule. (c) A fee to recover the estimated costs of enforcement of this chapter must be established by ordinance and must be fair, reasonable, and proportionate to the actual cost of the licensing and inspection services. The fee must only be maintained and used for the estimated costs of enforcing this chapter.